Massachusetts, session 194th, S316.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 38G of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “styles” in lines 251 and 287, the following
words:- “, strategies to develop students’ social-emotional learning competencies, including self-
awareness, self-management, social awareness, relationship skills, and responsible decision-
making,”
of 1